Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2336.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1505(e)(2)(iii) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended June 5, 2024 (P.L.366, No.18), is amended to read:§ 1505. Learners' permits.* * *(e) Authorization to test for driver's license and junior driver's license.--A person with a learner's permit is authorized to take the examination for a regular or junior driver's license for the class of vehicle for which a permit is held. Before a person under the age of 18 years may take the examination for a junior driver's license, including a Class M license to operate a motorcycle, the minor must:123456789101112131415161718 * * *(2) Present to the department a certification form signed by the father, mother, guardian, person in loco parentis or spouse of a married minor stating that the minor applicant has:* * *(iii) printed, at the department's discretion, or viewed educational materials provided on the department's publicly accessible Internet website on the dangers of distracted driving and unsafe driving in a work zone, which may include, but are not limited to, written, electronic or video materials.* * *Section 2. Section 1508 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1508. Examination of applicant for driver's license.* * *(c.2) Work zone awareness.--The portion of the examination on traffic laws shall contain at least one question relating to the driver's ability to understand how to drive safely in a work zone. The driver's manual shall include a section relating to how to drive safely in a work zone, along with related penalties.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2336PN3110 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425